Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 21 Transporting Animals and Poultry by Vehicle

Cross references. —

As to authority of state veterinarian over animals in transit, see §

11-19-110

.

As to estrays found in transit in shipment of cattle or horses, see §

11-24-109

.

As to when shipping estrays is prohibited, see §

11-24-113

.

As to transportation of meat or poultry unlawfully obtained or killed, and as to seizure and sale of the vehicle and contents, see §

11-30-107

.

As to requiring legislature to provide for the protection of livestock and stock owners, see art. 19, § 1, Wyo. Const.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-126

.

As to food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

13 Am. Jur. 2d Carriers §§ 400 to 407.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 10, 16 to 30.

§ 11-21-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2007,
ch. 105, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1931, ch. 27, § 1, related to the written permission of owner required; contents of permit.

§ 11-21-102.
Display
of permit to peace officer; written statement in lieu of permit.

Any operator or other
person in control of any vehicle transporting livestock, swine or
domestic fowls, or the carcasses thereof, upon demand of any peace
officer of Wyoming, shall exhibit his permit to carry the animals
or domestic fowls, or carcasses thereof.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 27, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 67-2002; C.S. 1945, § 56-802; W.S. 1957, § 11-399; W.S. 1977, §

11-24-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2007, ch. 105, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “or in lieu of such permit shall make a written statement containing the same information as is specified in W.S.

11-21-101

.”

§ 11-21-103.
Peace officer authorized to stop and inspect carrier; search with
or without warrant; seizure of animals unlawfully taken.

Any inspector, game warden or peace officer of the county or state of Wyoming may stop any vehicle carrying livestock, poultry, or carcasses thereof, for the purpose of examining the owner’s permit and the contents of the vehicle.

Any inspector, game warden or other peace officer of the county or state of Wyoming may detain any vehicle which he has probable cause to believe may contain stolen animals, poultry or carcasses thereof, for not to exceed twelve (12) hours or until a legal search warrant may be obtained. If the person in charge of the vehicle consents in writing to a search of the conveyance without a warrant, the search shall be made by the officer in the presence of the detained person as soon as the consent is obtained.

Any inspector, game warden or peace officer of the county or state of Wyoming may seize and take into custody any animals, poultry or carcasses thereof which have been unlawfully taken, unlawfully transported or which are unlawfully in possession.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 27, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 67-2003; C.S. 1945, § 56-803; W.S. 1957, § 11-400; Laws 1961, ch. 46, § 30; 1973, ch. 43, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

11-24-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-21-104.
Prohibited
acts; penalties for violations.

Any person who knowingly
exhibits or causes to be exhibited to any peace officer any false
or forged permit, or who, upon request of any peace officer of Wyoming,
refuses or neglects to exhibit a permit, shall be punished as provided
in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 27, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 67-2005; C.S. 1945, § 56-805; W.S. 1957, § 11-402; W.S. 1977, §

11-24-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 1982, ch. 75, § 2; 2007, ch. 105, § 1, ch. 215, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to forgery generally, see §§

6-3-602

through

6-3-604

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “makes a false statement as specified in W.S.

11-21-101

or

11-21-102

, or who” and deleted variants of “or statement,” throughout the section.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”